Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 2
AUTHORITY OF PERSON NOT A PEACE OFFICER
TO MAKE AN ARREST

16-3-201. Arrest by a private person.

A person who is not a peace officer may arrest another person when any crime has been or is being committed by the arrested person in the presence of the person making the arrest.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 199, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-201.

16-3-202. Assisting peace officer - arrest - furnishing information - immunity.

A peace officer making an arrest may command the assistance of any person who is in the vicinity.

A person commanded to assist a peace officer has the same authority to arrest as the officer who commands his assistance.

A person commanded to assist a peace officer in making an arrest shall not be civilly or criminally liable for any reasonable conduct in aid of the officer or for any acts expressly directed by the officer.

Private citizens, acting in good faith, shall be immune from any civil liability for reporting to any police officer or law enforcement authority the commission or suspected commission of any crime or for giving other information to aid in the prevention of any crime.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 200, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-202.

L. 77:

(4) added, p. 851, § 1, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For refusing to aid a peace officer, see § 18-8-107; for authority of sheriffs to command aid, see § 30-10-516.

16-3-203. Preventing a crime - reimbursement.

Any person who is not a peace officer as defined in section 24-31-301 (5), C.R.S., who is made the defendant in any civil action as a result of having sought to prevent a crime being committed against any other person, and who has judgment entered in his favor shall be entitled to all his court costs and to reasonable attorney fees incurred in such action.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 852, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 962, § 6, effective July 1, 1984.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1097, § 5, effective March 6.

Cross references:

(1) For awarding of attorney fees in civil actions generally, see § 13-17-102.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1992 act amending this section, see section 12 of chapter 167, Session Laws of Colorado 1992.